Tennessee, session 114, HB1697.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 5, Chapter 1, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
A county mayor may order the flags flown on county property to be lowered to
half-staff to honor the death of a prominent citizen of that county.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 6, Chapter 54, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
The chief executive officer of a municipality may order the flags flown on
municipal property to be lowered to half-staff to honor the death of a prominent citizen of
that municipality.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1697
011281
- 1 -